Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Part 7

Agricultural Regulatory Fund

43-1-701. Establishment — Source of fund — Accounting — Interest — Investment — Expenditures.

There is established within the general fund a special agency account to be known as the Tennessee agricultural regulatory fund, referred to in this part as “the fund.”

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, there shall be deposited in the fund all moneys collected pursuant to the following:

The Tennessee Plant Pest Act, compiled in chapter 6, part 1, of this title;

The Tennessee Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act, compiled in chapter 8, parts 1 and 2 of this title;

Chapter 8, part 3, of this title, relative to the aerial application of pesticides;

The Tennessee Seed Law of 1986, compiled in chapter 10 of this title;

The Tennessee Commercial Fertilizer Law of 1969, compiled in chapter 11, part 1 of this title;

The Tennessee Agricultural Liming Materials Act, compiled in chapter 11, part 4 of this title;

Section 43-27-104, relative to hemp;

The Tennessee Commercial Feed Law of 1972, compiled in title 44, chapter 6;

Title 44, chapter 7, relative to marks, brands, registration, and certification;

The Tennessee Livestock Dealer Act, compiled in title 44, chapter 10, part 2;

Title 44, chapter 11, relative to livestock sales;

Title 44, chapter 16, relative to baby chicks;

Title 47, chapter 26, relative to weights and measures;

The Tennessee Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act, compiled in title 53, chapter 1;

[Deleted by 2020 amendment.]

The Dairy Law of the State of Tennessee, compiled in title 53, chapter 3;

Title 53, chapter 7, relative to meat and poultry inspections;

The Tennessee Retail Food Safety Act, compiled in title 53, chapter 8, part 2;

Title 53, chapter 12 [repealed], relative to vending machines; and

Tennessee Application of Pesticides Act of 1978, compiled in title 62, chapter 21.

Any unencumbered moneys and any unexpended balance of the fund remaining at the end of any fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund, but shall be carried forward and maintained until expended in accordance with this part.

Moneys in the fund shall be invested by the state treasurer for the benefit of the fund pursuant to § 9-4-603. Interest accruing on investments and deposits of the fund shall be returned to the fund and remain a part of the fund. The fund shall be administered by the commissioner.

Moneys in the fund may be expended only in accordance with annual appropriations approved by the general assembly. Subject to the foregoing requirement, moneys in the fund shall be expended at the direction of the commissioner only to defray the costs associated with implementing and effectuating the purposes of the statutes specified in subsection (b).

Acts 1994, ch. 960, § 2; 2002, ch. 640, §§ 1-5; 2015, ch. 485, § 1; 2016, ch. 728, § 3; 2019, ch. 87, § 4; 2020, ch. 727, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Title 53, chapter 12, relative to vending machines, which is referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 150, § 7, effective April 17, 2017.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment rewrote the section which read: “(a) There is established within the general fund a special agency account to be known as the Tennessee agricultural regulatory fund, referred to in this part as “the fund.”.“(b)(1) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, there shall be deposited in the fund all fees, civil penalties, and damages collected pursuant to the following:“(A) Chapter 8, part 2 of this title, relative to pesticide dealers;“(B) The Tennessee Plant Pest Act of 1955, compiled in chapter 6, part 1 of this title;“(C) The Tennessee Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act, compiled in chapter 8, parts 1 and 2 of this title;“(D) Chapter 8, part 3 of this title, relative to the aerial application of pesticides;“(E) Tennessee Application of Pesticides Act of 1978, compiled in title 62, chapter 21; and“(F) Title 44, chapter 7, part 4 relative to the animal diagnostic laboratory.“(2) The commissioner of agriculture shall maintain separate accounting for the moneys collected and expended under each of the foregoing statutes.“(c) Any unencumbered moneys and any unexpended balance of the fund remaining at the end of any fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund, but shall be carried forward and maintained in separate accounts until expended in accordance with this part.“(d) Interest accruing on investments and deposits of the fund shall be returned to the fund and remain a part of the fund, allocated proportionately to each separate program.“(e) Moneys in the fund shall be invested by the state treasurer for the benefit of the fund pursuant to § 9-4-603. The fund shall be administered by the commissioner.“(f) Moneys in the fund may be expended only in accordance with annual appropriations approved by the general assembly. Subject to the foregoing requirement, moneys in the fund shall be expended at the direction of the commissioner only to defray the costs associated with implementing and effectuating the purposes of the statutes specified in subsection (b). Moneys deposited in the fund shall not revert at the end of any fiscal year; and all interest accruing on investments and deposits of the fund not otherwise expended shall be returned to and made a part of the fund. With respect to expenditures from the annual appropriations, the commissioner shall consult with a committee made up of the following: a nurseryman, actively engaged in the nursery business and designated by the Tennessee nurserymen's association; a greenhouse plant producer actively engaged in the business and designated by the plant production business; a representative designated by the Tennessee farm bureau; a licensed pest control operator actively engaged in the pest control business and designated by the Tennessee pest control association; and other representatives of organizations that may be affected by the regulatory provisions of those programs and services specified in subsection (b).”

The 2016 amendment, in (b)(7), substituted “§ 43-26-103(b)” for “§ 43-26-103(e)”.

The 2019 amendment substituted “43-27-104, relative to hemp” for “43-26-103(b), relative to industrial hemp” in (b)(7).

The 2020 amendment deleted (b)(15) which read: “The Tennessee Egg Law, compiled in title 53, chapter 2;”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 485, § 41. July 1, 2015; May 20, 2015, for the purpose of promulgating rules.

Acts 2016, ch. 728, § 4. April 7, 2016.

Acts 2019, ch. 87, § 13. April 4, 2019.

Acts 2020, ch. 727, § 4. June 22, 2020.

Cross-References. Animals and animal husbandry, title 44.

Chief executive officers of administrative departments, § 4-3-111.

Department of agriculture, creation, organization and powers of administrative

Department of environment and conservation, title 4, ch. 3, part 5.

Departments and divisions, title 4, ch. 3, part 2.

Farmers' extension work, § 5-9-104.

Food, drugs and cosmetics, title 53.

Natural areas preservation, title 11, ch. 14.

Salaries of Class 1 and Class 2 officers, § 8-23-101.

State forests, title 11, ch. 4.

Tennessee heritage conservation trust fund, title 11, ch. 7.

43-1-702. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 43-1-702 (Acts 1994, ch. 960, § 3), concerning the use of the Tennessee agricultural regulatory fund in defraying costs associated with administering regulatory programs, was repealed by Acts 2002, ch. 640, § 6, effective April 24, 2002.

43-1-703. Fees authorized — Regulations.

In order to facilitate the proper administration of each statute listed in § 43-1-701(b), the commissioner of agriculture shall establish fees through the promulgation of rules in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, for the various services and functions it performs under each of those statutes including, but not limited to, permit processing fees, license fees, registration fees, plans review fees, facility inspection fees, charter fees, and costs of the department.

Until fees are established in accordance with subsection (a), all fees in existence prior to January 1, 2015, under the statutes specified in § 43-1-701(b), shall remain in full force and effect.

It is the intent of the general assembly that the fees established pursuant to subsection (a) shall be used only to provide funding for implementation of, or improvement of the performance of the department in carrying out its duties under, the statutes specified in § 43-1-701(b), and the fees shall be graduated so that the fees are fairly apportioned to the extent practicable.

No permit or renewal of a permit shall be issued to an applicant for a permit under the foregoing authorities until all fees required by this part are paid in full.

If any part of a fee imposed under this part is not paid within fifteen (15) days of the due date, a late charge as provided by this part shall at once accrue and be added to the amount due.

In addition to other powers and authority provided in this part, the commissioner is authorized to seek injunctive relief in the chancery court of Davidson County or any court of competent jurisdiction for a judgment in the amount owed the state under this part.

Any person required to pay the fees set forth under this part who disagrees with the calculation or applicability of the fee may petition the commissioner for a hearing. To perfect a hearing, a petition for a hearing, together with the total amount of the fee due shall be received by the commissioner not later than fifteen (15) days after the due date. The hearing shall be in accordance with contested case provisions set forth in the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act. If it is determined that the amount in dispute was improperly assessed, the commissioner shall return the amount determined to be improperly assessed.

The fees of the department shall be assessed according to the following designated tiers:

Tier 1. The cost for a tier 1 license, permit, or fee shall be twenty-five dollars ($25.00). The late charge for this tier shall be twelve dollars ($12.00);

Tier 2. The cost for a tier 2 license, permit, or fee shall be fifty dollars ($50.00). The late charge for this tier shall be twenty-five dollars ($25.00);

Tier 3. The cost for a tier 3 license, permit, or fee shall be one hundred dollars ($100). The late charge for this tier shall be fifty dollars ($50.00);

Tier 4. The cost for a tier 4 license, permit, or fee shall be one hundred fifty dollars ($150). The late charge for this tier shall be seventy-five dollars ($75.00);

Tier 5. The cost for a tier 5 license, permit, or fee shall be two hundred dollars ($200). The late charge for this tier shall be one hundred dollars ($100);

Tier 6. The cost for a tier 6 license, permit, or fee shall be two hundred fifty dollars ($250). The late charge for this tier shall be one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125);

Tier 7. The cost for a tier 7 license, permit, or fee shall be three hundred dollars ($300). The late charge for this tier shall be one hundred fifty dollars ($150);

Tier 8. The cost for a tier 8 license, permit, or fee shall be three hundred fifty dollars ($350). The late charge for this tier shall be one hundred seventy-five dollars ($175);

Tier 9. The cost for a tier 9 license, permit, or fee shall be four hundred dollars ($400). The late charge for this tier shall be two hundred dollars ($200);

Tier 10. The cost for a tier 10 license, permit, or fee shall be five hundred dollars ($500). The late charge for this tier shall be two hundred fifty dollars ($250);

Tier 11. The cost for a tier 11 license, permit, or fee shall be seven hundred fifty dollars ($750). The late charge for this tier shall be three hundred seventy-five dollars ($375); and

Tier 12. The cost for a tier 12 license, permit, or fee shall be one thousand dollars ($1,000). The late charge for this tier shall be five hundred dollars ($500).

Acts 1994, ch. 960, § 4; 1998, ch. 636, § 2; 2002, ch. 640, §§ 7-14, 33; 2015, ch. 485, § 2.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment rewrote the section, which read: “(a) In order to facilitate the proper administration of each statute listed in § 43-1-701(b), the department of agriculture shall charge fees for the various services and functions it performs under each of those statutes, including, but not limited to, permit processing fees, license fees, registration fees, plans review fees, facility inspection fees, charter fees, and costs of the department as may be necessary to implement associated provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. The level of these fees shall be determined after careful consideration of the direct and indirect costs incurred by the department in performing its various functions and services under each of the statutes listed in § 43-1-701(b). It is the intention of the general assembly that the fees shall provide funding for implementation of the respective statutes and/or improvement of the performance of the department in carrying out its duties.“(b) The fees shall be adopted by regulations by the commissioner of agriculture.“(c) All fees in existence prior to January 1, 2002, under the statutes specified in § 43-1-701(b), shall be continued and shall be calculated and maintained with any such additional fees authorized in this part; provided, that such existing fees may be used in any manner consistent with the commissioner's authority, this part notwithstanding.“(d) No permit or renewal of a permit shall be issued to an applicant for a permit under the foregoing authorities until all fees required by this part are paid in full.“(e)(1) Unless otherwise stipulated in this part, if any part of any fee imposed under this part is not paid within fifteen (15) days of the due date, a penalty of five percent (5%) of the amount due shall at once accrue and be added to the amount due. Thereafter, on the first day of each month during which any part of any fee or any prior accrued penalty remains unpaid, an additional penalty of five percent (5%) of the then unpaid balance shall accrue and be added to the unpaid balance. In addition, the fees not paid within fifteen (15) days after the due date shall bear interest at the maximum lawful rate from the due date to the date paid.“(2) In addition to other powers and authority provided in this part, the commissioner is authorized to seek injunctive relief in the chancery court of Davidson County or any court of competent jurisdiction for a judgment in the amount owed the state under this part.“(3) Any person required to pay the fees set forth under this part who disagrees with the calculation or applicability of the fee may petition the commissioner for a hearing. In order to perfect a hearing, a petition for a hearing, together with the total amount of the fee due must be received by the commissioner not later than fifteen (15) days after the due date. The hearing shall be in accordance with contested case provisions set forth in the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. If it is finally determined that the amount in dispute was improperly assessed, the commissioner shall return the amount determined to be improperly assessed with interest.“(f) For the following categories, the fees shall not exceed the following maximum amounts; however, the commissioner is encouraged to use graduated fees to fairly apportion the fees:“(1) Aerial applicator licenses: two hundred dollars ($200);“(2) Aerial decals: one hundred fifty dollars ($150);“(3) Animal diagnostic laboratory services including but not limited to biopsy, necropsy, cytology, parasitology, virology, bacteriology, toxicology, and immunology: one hundred and fifty dollars ($150) per case or test;“(4) Commercial pesticide applicator certification: fifteen dollars ($15.00) for each examination, five dollars ($5.00) for each replacement card or new card issued upon completion of recertification;“(5) Florist certificate: twenty-five dollars ($25.00);“(6) License examinations: one hundred fifty dollars ($150);“(7) Nematode sample analysis: ten dollars ($10.00);“(8) Nursery stock or other plant material plant dealer certificates: two hundred dollars ($200);“(9) Pest control charter fee: two hundred dollars ($200);“(10) Pest control licenses: twenty dollars ($20.00) per category;“(11) Pesticide dealer license fee: fifty dollars ($50.00);“(12) Pesticide dealer license late fee: twenty-five dollars ($25.00);“(13) Pesticide product registration fee: one hundred dollars ($100);“(14) Pesticide product registration late fee: fifty dollars ($50.00);“(15) Phytosanitary certificates: equivalent to federal U.S. department of agriculture, animal and plant health inspection service fees;“(16) Private pesticide applicator certification: ten dollars ($10.00);“(17) Solicitor/technician cards: twenty dollars ($20.00); and“(18) Special local need (24-C) fee: two hundred fifty dollars ($250).“(g) The department shall have no authority to assess the fee imposed by subdivision (f)(8), the greenhouse plant certification fee, or any other licensure or plant certification fee established by this part against:“(1) Any person engaged in the production of tobacco seedlings; or“(2) Any farmer who produces and sells plants or seedlings in connection with such person's farming operations, but who is not primarily engaged in the business of producing and selling plants or seedlings, as determined by the commissioner.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 485, § 41. July 1, 2015; May 20, 2015, for the purpose of promulgating rules.

Cross-References. Effective date for fees promulgated by the rules and regulations authorized in this part, § 43-1-704.

43-1-704. Adjustment of fees.

Notwithstanding § 4-5-229, rules establishing fees promulgated pursuant to this chapter before July 1, 2016, shall take effect following expiration of the ninety (90) days as provided in § 4-5-207.

Beginning in 2020 and at least every five (5) years thereafter, the commissioner shall evaluate fees associated with the statutes specified in § 43-1-701(b) and may make adjustments through the rule-making process. Individual fees shall not be adjusted more than once every five (5) years.

After the initial adjustment under subsection (b), the percentage increase of any subsequent adjustment shall not exceed the percentage of increase in the average consumer price index, all items-city average, as published by the United States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, between the dates of one (1) adjustment and the immediately subsequent adjustment. Individual fee adjustment amounts may be rounded up to the next tier amount provided in § 43-1-703(f).

Fees established under § 43-1-703(a) and the statutes specified in § 43-1-701(b) shall not be increased in any year when the fund's fiscal year ending balance exceeds one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the fees collected in the previous year.

Acts 1994, ch. 960, § 5; 2002, ch. 640, §§ 15, 16; 2013, ch. 236, § 2; 2015, ch. 485, § 3.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “the chair of the agriculture and natural resources committee of the house of representatives and the chair of the energy, agriculture and natural resources committee of the senate” for “the chair of the agriculture committee of the house of representatives and the chair of the commerce, labor and agriculture committee of the senate” at the end of the last sentences in (c)(1) and (2).

The 2015 amendment rewrote the section, which read: “(a) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the commissioner of finance and administration shall certify to the commissioner of agriculture the amount of fees required by each program for the subsequent fiscal year based on the general appropriations act for that year. Upon receipt of such certification, all fee schedules shall be reviewed by the commissioner of agriculture. All fees and procedures for collecting fees shall be adopted pursuant to rulemaking procedures set forth in the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. In adopting the rules, the commissioner of agriculture shall consider detailed information regarding salary and staffing improvements and other costs to be funded by the proposed fee schedule or fee increases. The commissioner of agriculture shall not increase fees in any year general state revenues have decreased from the previous year. Pursuant to recommendations of the commissioner of agriculture, and within sixty (60) days after receiving the commissioner of finance and administration's certification of the amount of fees required by each program, the commissioner of agriculture shall submit to the commissioner of finance and administration an official estimate of fees to be collected by each program for the fiscal year. It is the intention of the general assembly that any fees authorized in this part become established by promulgation of rules and regulations within twelve (12) months of passage.“(b) The fee schedule promulgated by each of the entities listed in § 43-1-703 shall not, when added to their individual program fund balance for prior years, exceed one hundred fifty percent (150%).“(c)(1) Beginning in fiscal year 2003-2004 and each year thereafter, the commissioner shall prepare a report that summarizes all program expenditures and revenues associated with implementation of those statutes listed in § 43-1-701. The report shall be submitted to members of the committee specified in § 43-1-701(f) as well as the chair of the agriculture and natural resources committee of the house of representatives and the chair of the energy, agriculture and natural resources committee of the senate.“(2) Beginning in 2007 and at least every five (5) years thereafter, the commissioner shall evaluate fee schedules associated with the department's regulatory services and recommend adjustments as may be appropriate. The report shall be submitted to the chair of the agriculture and natural resources committee of the house of representatives and the chair of the energy, agriculture and natural resources committee of the senate.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 236, § 94. April 19, 2013.

Acts 2015, ch. 485, § 41. July 1, 2015; May 20, 2015, for the purpose of promulgating rules.

43-1-705. Conflict with federal law.

In the event that the requirements of this part conflict with applicable federal requirements pertaining to the establishment and collection of permit application or compliance fees by the department, the federal requirements shall take precedence over the conflicting requirements of this part. The commissioner of agriculture has the authority to collect the fees in § 43-1-701 and the fees established in accordance with applicable federal requirements.

Acts 1994, ch. 960, § 6.